Utah statutes.
25-6-11.   Legal principles applicable to chapter.
Unless displaced by this chapter, the principles of law and equity, including
merchant law and the law relating to principal and agent, equitable
subordination, estoppel, laches, fraud, misrepresentation, duress, coercion,
mistake, insolvency, or other validating or invalidating cause, supplement
this chapter's provisions.
